Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 896.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 896.5. The Oklahoma Legislature finds that certain


free-flowing streams and rivers of Oklahoma possess such unique


natural scenic beauty, water, fish, wildlife, and outdoor


recreational values of present and future benefit to the people of


the state that it is the policy of the Legislature to preserve these


areas for the benefit of the people of Oklahoma. For this purpose,


the following are hereby designated as scenic rivers:


1. The Flint Creek in Delaware County;


2. The Illinois River in Adair, Delaware and Cherokee Counties


above its confluence with the Barren Fork Creek;

Req. No. 114 Page 1


3. The Barren Fork Creek in Adair and Cherokee Counties from


the present alignment of U.S. Highway 59 West west to its confluence


with the Illinois River;


4. The Upper Mountain Fork River above the 600-foot six-


hundred-foot elevation level of Broken Bow Reservoir in McCurtain


and LeFlore Le Flore Counties;


5. Big Lee Creek in Sequoyah County, above the 420-foot four-


hundred-twenty-foot MSL elevation; and


6. Little Lee Creek in Adair and Sequoyah Counties;


7. The Glover River in McCurtain County; and


8. The Kiamichi River in Le Flore, Choctaw, and Pushmataha


Counties.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-114 RD 1/16/2025 2:23:07 PM











Req. No. 114 Page 2